Massachusetts, session 194th, H2112.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 148A of Chapter 149 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the first sentence the
following, “or under the personnel records provisions in Section 52C of this chapter.”
Section 150 of said Chapter 149 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended in the second paragraph by inserting after “33E” the
following, “52C”
of 1